Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. Protection of Purchasers.

§ 59.1-326.
Membership camping operator’s disclosure statement.

Every membership camping operator, salesperson, or other person who is in the business of offering for sale or transfer the rights under existing membership camping contracts for a fee shall deliver to his purchaser a current membership camping operator’s
disclosure statement before execution by the purchaser of the membership camping contract and no later than the date shown on such contract.

The membership camping operator’s disclosure statement shall consist of the following items in the order as presented:

A cover page stating:

The words “Membership Camping Operator’s Disclosure Statement” printed in boldfaced type of a minimum size of 10 points;

The name and principal business address of the membership camping operator;

A statement that the membership camping operator is in the business of offering for sale membership camping contracts;

The following statement printed in boldfaced type of a minimum size of 10 points:THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT CONTAINS IMPORTANT MATTERS TO BE CONSIDERED IN THE EXECUTION OF A MEMBERSHIP CAMPING CONTRACT. THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING OPERATOR IS REQUIRED BY LAW
TO DELIVER TO YOU A COPY OF THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT BEFORE YOU EXECUTE A MEMBERSHIP CAMPING CONTRACT. THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED HEREIN ARE ONLY SUMMARY IN NATURE. YOU AS A PROSPECTIVE PURCHASER SHOULD REVIEW ALL
REFERENCES, EXHIBITS, CONTRACT DOCUMENTS, AND SALES MATERIALS. YOU SHOULD NOT RELY UPON ANY ORAL REPRESENTATIONS AS BEING CORRECT. REFER TO THIS DOCUMENT AND TO THE ACCOMPANYING EXHIBITS FOR CORRECT REPRESENTATIONS.
THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING OPERATOR IS PROHIBITED FROM MAKING ANY REPRESENTATIONS WHICH CONFLICT WITH THOSE CONTAINED IN THE CONTRACT AND THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT.

The following statement printed in boldfaced type of a minimum size of 10 points:SHOULD YOU EXECUTE A MEMBERSHIP CAMPING CONTRACT, YOU HAVE THE UNQUALIFIED RIGHT TO CANCEL SUCH CONTRACT. THIS RIGHT OF CANCELLATION CANNOT BE WAIVED. THE RIGHT TO CANCEL
EXPIRES AT MIDNIGHT ON THE 7TH CALENDAR DAY FOLLOWING THE DATE ON WHICH THE CONTRACT WAS EXECUTED. TO CANCEL THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING CONTRACT, YOU AS THE PURCHASER MUST MAIL NOTICE OF YOUR INTENT TO CANCEL BY CERTIFIED
UNITED STATES MAIL TO THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING OPERATOR AT THE ADDRESS SHOWN IN THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING CONTRACT, POSTAGE PREPAID. THE CAMPING OPERATOR IS REQUIRED BY LAW TO RETURN ALL MONEYS PAID BY YOU IN CONNECTION
WITH THE EXECUTION OF THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING CONTRACT, UPON YOUR PROPER AND TIMELY CANCELLATION OF THE CONTRACT. IN ADDITION, AFTER THE INITIAL 7-CALENDAR-DAY CANCELLATION PERIOD, YOU THE PURCHASER OR YOUR SUCCESSOR
IN INTEREST MAY TERMINATE YOUR LIABILITY UNDER THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING CONTRACT INCLUDING PAYMENT OF ANY MEMBERSHIP FEES, DUES, AND ASSESSMENTS UPON YOUR GIVING PROPER AND EFFECTIVE NOTICE TO THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING
OPERATOR. TO BE EFFECTIVE, THE NOTICE MUST BE IN WRITING AND SENT BY CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED AND IT MUST CONTAIN: (1) YOUR TRANSFER OF ANY AND ALL RIGHTS, TITLE, AND INTEREST YOU HAVE IN THE MEMBERSHIP
CAMPING CONTRACT AND CAMPGROUND BACK TO THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING OPERATOR; (2) A RECORDABLE DEED, DULY EXECUTED AND NOTARIZED, AND THE RECORDING FEE, IF YOU RECEIVED A RECORDED DEED FROM THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING OPERATOR;
(3) PAYMENTS OF (i) THE UNPAID BALANCE OF THE PURCHASE PRICE AND ANY ACCRUED UNPAID INTEREST THEREON AND (ii) ALL UNPAID MEMBERSHIP FEES, DUES, AND ASSESSMENTS WITH ACCRUED INTEREST THEREON PERMITTED BY THE MEMBERSHIP
CAMPING CONTRACT; AND (4) PAYMENT OF ALL OTHER UNPAID FINANCIAL OBLIGATIONS OWED BY YOU THE PURCHASER PURSUANT TO THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING CONTRACT.

The following statement:“Registration of the membership camping operator with the Commissioner of the Virginia Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services does not constitute an approval or endorsement by the Commissioner of the membership camping
operator, his membership camping contract, or his campground.”

The membership camping operator shall promptly amend his membership camping operator’s disclosure statement to reflect any material change in the campground or its facilities. He shall also promptly file any such amendments with the Commissioner.

2.
The name of the membership camping operator and the address of his principal place of business and the following information:

a.
The name, principal occupation, and address of every director, partner, or trustee of the membership camping operator;

b.
The name and address of each person owning or controlling an interest of 10 percent or more in the membership camping operator;

c.
The particulars of any indictment, conviction, judgment, decree, or order of any court or administrative agency against the membership camping operator or its managing entity arising out of the violation or alleged violation
of any federal, state, local, or foreign law or regulation in connection with activities relating to the sale of campground memberships, land sales, land investments, security sales, construction, or sale of homes or improvements or
any similar or related activity; and

d.
A statement of any unsatisfied judgments against the membership camping operator or its managing entity, the status of any pending suits involving the sale of membership camping contracts or the management of campgrounds
to which the membership camping operator or its managing entity is a party and the status of any pending suits, administrative proceedings, or indictments of significance to the campground;

3.
A brief description of the nature of the purchaser’s right or license to use the campground and the facilities that are to be available for use by purchasers;

4.
A brief description of the membership camping operator’s experience in the membership camping business, including the length of time the operator has been in the membership camping business;

5.
The location of each of the campgrounds that is to be available for use by purchasers and a brief description of the facilities at each campground that are currently available for use by purchasers. Facilities that are planned,
incomplete, or not yet available for use shall be clearly identified as incomplete or unavailable. A brief description of any facilities that are or will be available to nonpurchasers shall also be provided;

6.
As to all memberships offered by the membership camping operator at each campground:

a.
The form of membership offered;

b.
The types and duration of memberships along with a summary of the major privileges, restrictions, and limitations applicable to each type; and

c.
Provisions, if any, that have been made for public utilities at each campsite including water, electricity, telephone, and sewerage facilities;

7.
A statement regarding any initial or special fee due from the purchaser together with a description of the purpose and method of calculating the fee;

8.
A description of any liens, defects, or encumbrances affecting the campground;

9.
A general description of any financing offered or available through the membership camping operator;

10.
A statement that the purchaser has until midnight of the seventh calendar day following the signing of the membership campground contract to cancel the contract by proper notice to the membership camping operator;

11.
A description of the insurance coverage that the membership camping operator provides for the benefit of purchasers, if any;

12.
A statement regarding any fees or charges that purchasers are or may be required to pay for the use of the campground or any facilities;

13.
The extent to which financial arrangements, if any, have been provided for the completion of facilities together with a statement of the membership camping operator’s obligation to complete planned facilities. The statement
shall include a description of any restrictions or limitations on the membership camping operator’s obligation to begin or to complete such facilities;

14.
The name of the managing entity, if there is one, and the significant terms of any management contract, including but not limited to the circumstances under which the membership camping operator may terminate the management
contract;

15.
A statement regarding any services that the membership camping operator currently provides or expenses he pays that are expected to become the responsibility of the purchasers, including the projected liability that each
such service or expense may impose on each purchaser;

16.
A brief description of the ownership in or other right to use the campground that is to be transferred to each purchaser, together with the duration of any lease, license, franchise, or reciprocal agreement entitling the
membership camping operator or purchasers from him to use the campground, and any provisions in any such agreements that restrict or limit a purchaser’s use of the campground;

17. a.
A copy, whether by way of supplement or otherwise, of the rules, restrictions, or covenants regulating the purchaser’s use of the campground in Virginia and its facilities that are to be available for use by the purchasers,
including a statement of whether and how the rules, restrictions, or covenants may be changed;

b.
A summary, whether by way of supplement or otherwise, of the rules, restrictions, or covenants regulating the purchaser’s use of any other campgrounds, facilities, or any other amenities resulting from the purchase of, or
used as an inducement to influence the purchase of, the membership camping contract;

18.
A description of any restraints on the transfer of the membership camping contract;

19.
A brief description of the policies covering the availability of camping sites, the availability of reservations and the conditions under which they are made;

20.
A brief description of any grounds for forfeiture of a purchaser’s membership camping contract;

21.
A statement of whether the membership camping operator has the right to withdraw permanently from use all or any portion of any campground devoted to membership camping and, if so, the conditions under which such withdrawal
is to be permitted;

22.
A statement describing the material terms and conditions of any reciprocal program to be available to the purchaser, including a statement concerning whether the purchaser’s participation in any reciprocal program is dependent
upon the continued affiliation of the membership camping operator with that reciprocal program and whether the membership camping operator reserves the right to terminate such affiliation;

23.
The following statement printed in boldfaced type of a minimum size of 10 points:“The purchase of this membership camping contract should not be based on any representations that it is an investment or that it can be resold.
The resale of a membership may be difficult”; and

24.
A statement that contains in boldfaced type the name, address, and telephone number of the Virginia Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services and that states that that agency is the regulatory agency that handles consumer
complaints regarding membership campgrounds.

History.
1985, c. 409; 1992, c. 545; 2013, c. 24.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 24, in subsection B, added “items in the order as presented” at the end of the introductory language, deleted “followed by” at the end of B 1 a, B 1 b, and B 1 c, substituted “statement printed in boldfaced” for “in printed boldfaced”
at the beginning of B 1 d, substituted “statement” for “language,” and deleted “after the appearance of the items required in subdivisions a through d above” at the end of the introductory language of B 1 e; substituted “statement”
for “language below all statements required in subdivisions a through e above” in the introductory language of B 1 f; added “and the following information” at the end of B 2; inserted “A statement regarding” at the beginning of B 7,
B 12 and B 15; substituted “statement” for “language” in the introductory language of B 23; and deleted “State Division of Consumer Affairs” following “Consumer Services” in B 24; and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

§ 59.1-327.
Purchaser’s rights.

The purchaser shall have the following rights during the first seven calendar days following the execution of the membership camping contract:

A purchaser shall have the right to cancel a membership camping contract within seven calendar days following the date of its execution.

The right of cancellation shall not be waived and any attempt to obtain such a waiver shall be unlawful. Nothing in this section shall preclude the execution of documents in advance of closing for delivery after expiration of the cancellation period.

If the purchaser elects to cancel the membership camping contract, he may do so only by mailing notice thereof by certified United States mail to the membership camping operator at the address listed in the membership camping contract. The cancellation
shall be deemed effective upon mailing.

Upon cancellation, the membership camping operator shall refund to the purchaser all payments made by such purchaser and collected by the membership camping operator pursuant to the canceled membership camping contract. The refund shall be made within
sixty days after the effective date of the cancellation and may, where payment has been made by credit card, be made by an appropriate credit to the purchaser’s account. Where payment is made by an exchange of real or personal
property, the property may be returned to the purchaser.

The purchaser’s right to cancel shall apply only to the initial membership camping contract executed by such purchaser and to no successor contract and shall not apply to a successor contract which replaces an existing contract executed by such purchaser,
unless the successor contract is executed within seven calendar days of the original contract in which case the cancellation period shall renew itself.

In addition to the rights afforded the purchaser contained in subsection A of this section, the purchaser and any successor in interest shall not be held liable for any maintenance fees, dues, and assessments succeeding the effective date of notification
pursuant to subdivision 2 of this subsection, if:

The purchaser or his successor in interest relinquishes any and all interest in the membership camping contract to the membership camping operator or his assigns; and

The purchaser or his successor in interest notifies the membership camping operator or his assigns, in writing, by certified mail, return receipt requested, of his relinquishment. The notice shall be deemed effective:

Eighteen months after the notice is mailed provided the membership camping contract is no less than fifty-four months old; and

If and only if the principal and interest payments, the membership fees, dues, and assessments and all other financial obligations owed by the purchaser, or his successor in interest, under the membership camping contract are paid in full as of the date
of mailing; and

The relinquishment contained in subdivision B 1 shall be in the form of a recordable deed, duly executed and properly notarized, or other form found acceptable to the membership camping operator accompanied by a fee sufficient to record the deed.

If the notice complies with subsection B of this section concerning avoiding further payments of membership fees, dues, and assessments, the membership camping operator shall confirm, in writing, receipt of the notice within ten days after its receipt.
If the notice does not comply with subsection B of this section, the membership camping operator or his assigns shall inform the purchaser or his successors in interest, in writing, within ten days after its receipt, of the specific
reasons why the notice does not comply.

All moneys collected by the membership camping operator pursuant to the membership camping contract prior to notification by the purchaser or his successor in interest pursuant to subsection B of this section shall remain the property of the membership
camping operator.

Upon satisfaction of all provisions of subsection B of this section, the purchaser or his successor in interest shall have no rights or obligations under the membership camping contract and the membership camping operator or his assigns shall make no
claims against the purchaser or his successor in interest thereunder.

History.
1985, c. 409; 1992, c. 545.

§ 59.1-328.
Membership camping contracts.

The membership camping operator shall deliver to his purchaser a fully executed copy of the membership camping contract, which contract shall include at least the following information:

The actual date the membership camping contract is executed by the purchaser.

The name of the membership camping operator and the address of his principal place of business.

The total financial obligation imposed upon the purchaser by the contract, including the initial purchase price and any additional charges that the purchaser may be required to pay.

A description of the nature and duration of the membership being purchased, including any interest in real property.

A statement that the membership camping operator, salesperson, or any other person who is in the business of offering for sale or transfer the rights under existing membership camping contracts for a fee is required by the Virginia Membership Camping
Act (§ 59.1-311 et seq.) to provide each purchaser with a copy of the membership camping operator’s disclosure statement prior to execution of such contract and that a failure to do so is a violation of the Act.

The following statement under its own paragraph and conspicuously placed:“PURCHASER’S NONWAIVABLE RIGHT TO CANCEL” shall appear at the beginning of such paragraph in boldfaced type of a minimum size of 10 points, immediately preceding the following statement,
which shall appear in type no smaller than the other provisions of the contract:YOU AS THE PURCHASER HAVE A NONWAIVABLE 7-CALENDAR-DAY RIGHT OF CANCELLATION. THIS RIGHT OF CANCELLATION IS FULLY EXPLAINED ON THE COVER SHEET OF THE
MEMBERSHIP CAMPING OPERATOR’S DISCLOSURE STATEMENT. YOU ARE URGED TO REVIEW THE DISCLOSURE STATEMENT PRIOR TO THE EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT FOR A COMPLETE UNDERSTANDING OF YOUR RIGHT OF CANCELLATION. IN ADDITION, AFTER THE INITIAL
7-CALENDAR-DAY CANCELLATION PERIOD, YOU THE PURCHASER OR YOUR SUCCESSOR IN INTEREST MAY TERMINATE YOUR LIABILITY UNDER THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING CONTRACT INCLUDING PAYMENT OF ANY MEMBERSHIP FEES, DUES, AND ASSESSMENTS UPON YOUR GIVING
PROPER AND EFFECTIVE NOTICE TO THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING OPERATOR. TO BE EFFECTIVE, THE NOTICE MUST BE IN WRITING AND SENT BY CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED AND IT MUST CONTAIN: (1) YOUR TRANSFER OF ANY AND ALL RIGHTS, TITLE,
AND INTEREST YOU HAVE IN THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING CONTRACT AND CAMPGROUND BACK TO THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING OPERATOR; (2) A RECORDABLE DEED, DULY EXECUTED AND NOTARIZED, AND THE RECORDING FEE, IF YOU RECEIVED A RECORDED DEED FROM THE
MEMBERSHIP CAMPING OPERATOR; (3) PAYMENTS OF (i) THE UNPAID BALANCE OF THE PURCHASE PRICE AND ANY ACCRUED UNPAID INTEREST THEREON AND (ii) ALL UNPAID MEMBERSHIP FEES, DUES, AND ASSESSMENTS WITH ACCRUED INTEREST THEREON PERMITTED
BY THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING CONTRACT; AND (4) PAYMENT OF ALL OTHER UNPAID FINANCIAL OBLIGATIONS OWED BY YOU THE PURCHASER PURSUANT TO THE MEMBERSHIP CAMPING CONTRACT.

The full name of all salespersons involved in the execution of the membership camping contract.

A statement that contains, in boldfaced type, the name, address, and telephone number of the Virginia Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, stating that that agency is the regulatory agency handling consumer complaints regarding membership
campgrounds.

History.
1985, c. 409; 1992, c. 545; 2013, c. 24.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 24 deleted “shall appear in the contract” following “The following statement” in subdivision 6 and “Division of Consumer Affairs” following “Consumer Services” in subdivision 8, and made minor stylistic and punctuation changes
throughout.

§ 59.1-329.
Escrow and bonding.

All purchase money received from or on behalf of a purchaser in connection with the execution of a membership camping contract shall be deposited in an escrow or trust account designated solely for that purpose, which may be the membership camping operator’s
own escrow or trust account or that of his attorney’s, until the expiration of the time for cancellation has expired unless a later time is provided in the membership camping contract. If the contract has not been canceled, any
purchase money received from a purchaser may be released to the membership camping operator upon:

The conveying to the purchaser of the title to, interest in, or right or license to use the campground and facilities as required in the membership camping contract; or

The forfeiture of the purchase money by the purchaser under the terms of the membership camping contract.

In lieu of the obligations imposed by subsection A, the membership camping operator may file and maintain with the Commissioner a surety bond issued in favor of the Commissioner for the benefit of purchasers insuring the escrow of the purchase money until
such time as it may be released as outlined in subsection A. Such bond may not be canceled until thirty days after written notice of cancellation is received by the Commissioner. In lieu of such bond, the membership camping operator
may post with the Commissioner an irrevocable letter of credit in a form and content acceptable to the Commissioner. The penalty of the bond or letter of credit shall be adjusted from time to time in accordance with the following
schedule:

Click to view

The amount of purchase money paid by purchasers held at any one time by the membership camping operator shall not exceed the amount for which the operator is bonded or the letter of credit is issued in accordance with the schedule set forth in subsection
B.

In addition to any bonding requirements contained in this section, the membership camping operator shall file and maintain with the Commissioner a payment and performance bond with surety issued in favor of the Commissioner for the benefit of the purchasers
and which guarantees the completion of all incomplete or planned facilities constructed or to be constructed in this Commonwealth as outlined or listed in either the membership camping contract or the membership camping operator’s
disclosure statement. The bond may not be canceled until thirty days after written notice of cancellation is received by the Commissioner. In lieu of the bond the membership camping operator may post with the Commissioner an irrevocable
letter of credit. The surety bond or letter of credit shall be in a form and content acceptable to the Commissioner. The penalty of the bond or letter of credit shall be in an amount equal to the cost of completing the incomplete
or planned facilities as of the date of its issuance or as of the membership camping operator’s application for continued registration date as provided in § 59.1-320.1, whichever is later.

TOTAL AMOUNT OF PURCHASE PENALTY OF BOND MONEY HELD 1. $0 to $200,000 $50,000 2. $200,000 to $500,000 $75,000 3. Over $500,000 $100,000

History.
1985, c. 409; 1992, c. 545.

§ 59.1-330.
Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 545.

Cross references.

For present provision for noncomplying contract being voidable, see § 59.1-330.1.

For present provision for fraud rendering contract voidable, see § 59.1-330.2.

§ 59.1-330.1.
Noncomplying contract voidable.

Any membership camping contract which does not comply with the applicable provisions of this chapter shall be voidable at the option of the purchaser.

History.
1992, c. 545.

§ 59.1-330.2.
Fraud rendering contract voidable.

Any membership camping contract entered into by the purchaser upon any false, misleading, prohibited, or unlawful information, representation, notice, or advertisement of the membership camping operator or the operator’s agent shall be voidable at the
option of the purchaser.

History.
1992, c. 545.

§ 59.1-331.
Resale of memberships.

In the event of the resale of a membership by a purchaser who is neither a membership camping operator nor any other person who is in the business of offering for sale or transfer the rights under existing membership camping contracts for a fee, such
purchaser (hereinafter in this section called “owner”) shall furnish to the new purchaser before the execution of any instrument of conveyance a copy of the membership camping contract and a certificate containing:

A statement disclosing any right of first refusal or other restraint on transfer of the membership.

A statement setting forth the amount of the periodic payments which are required by the contract including any amounts currently due and payable.

That the membership camping operator may have a valid reason for not transferring the contract to the new purchaser.

That there may have been changes in the rules or regulations concerning the rights and obligations of the membership camping operator or purchasers, including changes with respect to membership fees, dues, and assessments, or that some campgrounds or
facilities may have been withdrawn.

Any other material changes or risks to the purchaser known to the owner.

The membership camping operator within ten days after receipt of a written request by an owner, shall furnish the owner with a written certificate containing the information necessary to enable the owner to comply with subdivisions 1 and 2 of subsection
A of this section. An owner providing such certificate pursuant to subsection A is not liable to the purchaser for any erroneous information provided by the membership camping operator and included in the certificate. The membership
camping operator is not liable to either the owner or the new purchaser for any information not provided by him.

History.
1985, c. 409; 1992, c. 545.

§ 59.1-332.
Conditions on offering items as an inducement to execute.

It is unlawful for any person by any means, as part of an advertising program, to offer any item of value as an inducement to the recipient to visit a membership camping operator’s campground, attend a sales presentation, or contact a salesperson, unless
the person clearly discloses in writing in the offer in readily understandable language each of the following:

The name and campground address of the membership camping operator.

A general statement that the advertising program is being conducted by a membership camping operator and the purpose of any requested visit.

A statement of odds, in Arabic numerals, of receiving each item offered.

The approximate retail value of each item offered.

The number of campgrounds that are participating in such advertising program.

The restrictions, qualifications, and other conditions that must be satisfied before the recipient is entitled to receive the item, including:

Any deadline, if any, by which the recipient must visit the campground, attend the sales presentation, or contact a salesperson in order to receive the item.

The approximate duration of any visit and sales presentation.

The date upon which the offer shall terminate and the final date upon which the gifts or prizes are to be awarded.

Any other conditions, such as minimum age qualification, a financial qualification, or a requirement that if the recipient is married both spouses must be present in order to receive the item.

It is unlawful for any person making an offer subject to subsection A, or any employee or agent of the person, to offer any item if the person knows or has reason to know that the offered item will not be available in a sufficient quantity based on the
reasonably anticipated response to the offer.

It is unlawful for any person making an offer subject to subsection A, or any employee or agent of the person, to fail to provide any offered item that any recipient who has responded to the offer in the manner specified in the offer, has performed the
requirements disclosed in the offer, and has met the qualifications described in the offer is entitled to receive, unless the offered item is not reasonably available and the offer discloses the reservation of a right to provide
a rain check or a like or substitute item if the offered item is unavailable.

If the person making an offer subject to subsection A is unable to provide an offered item because of limitations of supply, quantity, or quality not reasonably foreseeable or controllable by the person making the offer, the person making the offer shall
inform the recipient of the recipient’s right to receive a rain check for the item offered, unless the person making the offer knows or has a reasonable basis for knowing that the item will not be reasonably available at approximately
the same price to the person making the offer, and shall inform the recipient of the recipient’s right to at least one of the following additional options:

The person making the offer will provide a like item of equivalent or greater retail value or a rain check for the item. This option must be offered if the offered item is not reasonably available.

The person making the offer will provide a substitute item of equivalent or greater retail value.

The person making the offer will provide a rain check for a like or substitute item.

If a rain check is provided, the person making an offer subject to subsection A shall, within a reasonable time, and in any event not more than 90 days after the rain check is provided, deliver the agreed item to the recipient’s address without additional
cost or obligation to the recipient, unless the item for which the rain check is provided remains unavailable because of limitations of supply, quantity, or quality not reasonably foreseeable or controllable by the person making
the offer. If the item is unavailable for these reasons, the person shall, not more than 30 days after the expiration of the aforesaid 90-day period, deliver a like item of equal or greater retail value or, if the item is not reasonably
available to the person at approximately the same price, a substitute item of equal or greater retail value.

On the written request of a recipient who has received or claims a right to receive any offered item, the person making an offer subject to subsection A shall furnish to the recipient sufficient evidence showing that the item provided matches the item
randomly or otherwise selected for distribution to that recipient.

It is unlawful for any person making an offer subject to subsection A, or any employee or agent of the person, to:

Misrepresent the size, quantity, identity, or quality of any prize, gift, money, or other item of value offered.

Misrepresent in any manner the odds of receiving any particular gift, prize, amount of money, or other item of value.

Label any offer a “notice of termination” or “notice of cancellation.”

Materially misrepresent, in any manner, the offer or program.

If any provision of this section is in conflict with the provisions of the Prizes and Gifts Act (§ 59.1-415 et seq.), the provisions of the Prizes and Gifts Act shall control.

7.
A statement that the membership camping operator reserves the right to provide a rain check or a substitute or like item, if these rights are reserved.

8.
All other material rules, terms, and conditions of the offer or program.

History.
1985, c. 409; 1992, c. 545; 2020, c. 900.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 900, in subdivision A 6 d, substituted “spouses” for “husband and wife”; and made stylistic changes throughout the section.

§ 59.1-333.
Nondisturbance provisions.

With respect to any property in this Commonwealth acquired and put into operation by a membership camping operator after July 1, 1985, the membership camping operator shall neither offer nor execute a membership camping contract in this Commonwealth granting
the right to use such property until:

Each person holding an interest in a blanket encumbrance shall have executed and delivered a nondisturbance agreement which includes the following provisions: (i) that the rights of the owner or owners of the blanket encumbrance in the affected campground
are subordinate to the rights of purchasers, and (ii) that any person who acquires the affected campground or any portion thereof by the exercise of any right of sale or foreclosure contained in such agreement shall take the same
subject to the rights of the purchasers, and (iii) that the owner or owners of the blanket encumbrance shall not use or cause the property to be used in any manner which interferes with the right of the purchasers to use the campground
and its facilities in accordance with the terms and conditions of the membership camping contract. Such agreement shall be recorded in the clerk’s office of the circuit court in which the property is located; and

Every financial institution providing a major hypothecation loan to the membership camping operator (the “hypothecation lender”) which has a lien on, or security interest in the membership camping operator’s ownership interest in the campground shall
have executed and delivered a nondisturbance agreement and recorded such agreement in the clerk’s office of the circuit court in which the campground is located. In addition, each person holding an interest in a blanket encumbrance
superior to the interest held by the hypothecation lender shall have executed, delivered and recorded an instrument stating that such person shall give the hypothecation lender notice of, and at least thirty days to cure, any default
under the blanket encumbrance before such person commences any foreclosure action affecting the campground. For the purposes of this provision, a major hypothecation loan to a membership camping operator is a loan or line of credit
secured by substantially all of the contracts receivable arising from the membership camping operator’s sale of membership camping contracts; or

There shall have been delivered to and accepted by the Commissioner a surety bond or letter of credit satisfying the following requirements: The surety bond or letter of credit shall be issued to the Commissioner for the benefit of purchasers and shall
be in an amount which is not less than 105 percent of the remaining principal balance of every indebtedness secured by a blanket encumbrance affecting the campground. Such bond shall be issued by a surety authorized to do business
in this Commonwealth and having sufficient net worth to satisfy the indebtedness. Such letter of credit shall be irrevocable and shall be drawn upon a bank, savings and loan, or financial institution and shall be in form and content
acceptable to the Commissioner. The bond or letter of credit shall provide for payment of all amounts secured by the blanket encumbrance, including costs, expenses, and legal fees of the lien holder, if for any reason the blanket
encumbrance is enforced. The bond or letter of credit may be reduced at the option of the membership camping operator periodically in proportion to the reductions of the amounts secured by the blanket encumbrance.

The nondisturbance agreement may be amended provided the provisions of this section are not diminished or altered by the amendment.

History.
1985, c. 409.